Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-712.07
Public records; public access; equitable relief; attorney's fees; costs.

The provisions of sections 84-712, 84-712.01, 84-712.03 to 84-712.09, and 84-1413 pertaining to the rights of citizens to access to public records may be enforced by equitable relief, whether or not any other remedy is also available. In any case in which the complainant seeking access has substantially prevailed, the court may assess against the public body which had denied access to their records, reasonable attorney fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred by the complainant.

Laws 1979, LB 86, § 7.